fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-D-mitihtihkosiy_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - mitihtihkosiy - ok : # -m animate dependent noun, kidney	AEW NDA2
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+PxX+Sg: mitihtihkosiy
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Sg: nitihtihkosiy
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Sg: kitihtihkosiy
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Sg: nitihtihkosînân
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Sg: kitihtihkosînaw
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Sg: kitihtihkosîwâw
     
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+PxX+Obv: mitihtihkosiya
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Obv: nitihtihkosiya
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Obv: kitihtihkosiya
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Obv: nitihtihkosînâna
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Obv: kitihtihkosînawa
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Obv: kitihtihkosîwâwa
     
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Obv: otihtihkosiya
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Px3Pl+Obv: otihtihkosîwâwa
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: otihtihkosîyiwa


     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+PxX+Pl: mitihtihkosiyak
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Pl: nitihtihkosiyak
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Pl: kitihtihkosiyak
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Pl: nitihtihkosînânak
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Pl: kitihtihkosînawak
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Pl: kitihtihkosîwâwak

     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+PxX+Loc: mitihtihkosîhk
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Loc: nitihtihkosîhk
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Loc: kitihtihkosîhk
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Loc: nitihtihkosînâhk
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Loc: kitihtihkosînâhk
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Loc: kitihtihkosîwâhk

     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Loc: otihtihkosîhk
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Px3Pl+Loc: otihtihkosîwâhk
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: otihtihkosîyihk

     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+PxX+Sg:      [micihcihkosîs,     micihcihkosîsis]
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Sg:    [nicihcihkosîs,     nicihcihkosîsis]
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Sg:    [kicihcihkosîs,     kicihcihkosîsis]
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Sg:    [nicihcihkosîsinân, nicihcihkosîsisinân]
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Sg:   [kicihcihkosîsinaw, kicihcihkosîsisinaw]
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Sg:    [kicihcihkosîsiwâw, kicihcihkosîsisiwâw]

     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px3Sg+Obv:    [ocihcihkosîsa,     ocihcihkosîsisa]
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px3Pl+Obv:    [ocihcihkosîsiwâwa, ocihcihkosîsisiwâwa]
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: [ocihcihkosîsiyiwa, ocihcihkosîsisiyiwa]

     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+PxX+Pl:      [micihcihkosîsak,     micihcihkosîsisak]
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Pl:    [nicihcihkosîsak,     nicihcihkosîsisak]
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Sg+Pl:    [kicihcihkosîsak,     kicihcihkosîsisak]
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px1Pl+Pl:    [nicihcihkosîsinânak, nicihcihkosîsisinânak]
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px21Pl+Pl:   [kicihcihkosîsinawak, kicihcihkosîsisinawak]
     mitihtihkosiy+N+A+D+Der/Dim+N+A+D+Px2Pl+Pl:    [kicihcihkosîsiwâwak, kicihcihkosîsisiwâwak]
